Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2918
Rules and regulations.

(1) The Supreme Court, upon recommendation by the director in consultation with the council, shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Dispute Resolution Act.

(2) The office may adopt and promulgate policies and procedures to carry out the Dispute Resolution Act.

Laws 1991, LB 90, § 18;

Laws 2019, LB595, § 19.